Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 12

Miscellaneous Provisions

61-3-1201. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it. The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed does not apply to this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1202. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1203. Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before January 1, 2018.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1204. Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1205. Fees.

The secretary of state shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection (a) are delivered to the secretary of state for filing:

Annual report for secretary of state — $20.00;

Application for use of indistinguishable name — $20.00;

Application for reservation of limited partnership name — $20.00;

Notice of transfer of reserved name — $20.00;

Notice of cancellation of reserved name — $20.00;

Statement of change of registered agent/office (by domestic/foreign limited partnership) — $20.00;

Statement of change of registered office of limited partnership (by agent) — $5.00 per limited partnership, but not less than $20.00;

Statement of resignation of registered agent for limited partnership — $20.00;

Certificate of limited partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) — $100;

Amendment to the certificate of limited partnership — $20.00;

Certificate of cancellation of limited partnership — $20.00;

Restated certificate of limited partnership — $20.00;

Amended and restated certificate of limited partnership — $20.00;

Articles of merger of limited partnership — $100;

Application for registration of foreign limited partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) — $600;

Application for amended registration of foreign limited partnership — $20.00;

Certificate of cancellation of registration of foreign limited partnership — $20.00;

Certificate of correction — $20.00;

Execution, amendment or cancellation of limited partnership by judicial order — No Fee;

Application for certificate of existence or registration of limited partnership — $20.00;

Application for reinstatement — $70.00;

Statement of dissolution — $20.00;

Statement of withdrawn or rescinded dissolution of limited partnership — $20.00; and

Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter — $20.00.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under this chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership. All copies must be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1; 2018, ch. 575, §§ 34, 35.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “Articles” for “Certificate” at the beginning of (a)(14); and rewrote (a)(23) which read: “Withdrawal statement — $25.00; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 575, § 42. March 16, 2018.

61-3-1206. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 2017.”

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-1207. Applicability — Savings clause.

This chapter applies to:

Every domestic limited partnership formed on or after January 1, 2018;

Any domestic limited partnership that was formed prior to January 1, 2018, and that has elected to be governed by this chapter pursuant to subsection (b); and

The outstanding and future interests in the respective domestic limited partnerships described in subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B).

If there are other specific statutory provisions that govern the formation of, impose restrictions or requirements on, confer special powers, privileges or authorities on or fix special procedures or methods for special categories of limited partnerships, then, to the extent those provisions are inconsistent with or different from this chapter, those provisions prevail.

On or after January 1, 2018, a domestic limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 2018, under the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988, compiled in chapter 2 of this title, may voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter by amending its certificate of limited partnership to include the statement “This limited partnership elects to be governed by the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 2017,” or a statement of like import. The election and amendment to the certificate of limited partnership is not effective unless it has been approved in a record by:

All general partners; and

The limited partners or, if there is more than one (1) class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate.

Any partnership presently governed by the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988 that does not voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), continues to be governed by the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988.

Any limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1988, that is presently governed by the limited partnership law in effect prior to January 1, 1988, may voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter by filing a certificate of limited partnership pursuant to § 61-3-201. The certificate must include the statement “This limited partnership elects to be governed by the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 2017,” or a statement of like import. This election and the filing of the certificate of limited partnership is not effective unless it has been approved in a record by:

All general partners; and

The limited partners or, if there is more than one (1) class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate.

Any limited partnership that does not voluntarily elect to be governed by this chapter pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), shall continue to be governed by the law under which the limited partnership is presently governed, except that the limited partnership shall not have its term extended other than under this chapter.

This chapter applies to:

Every foreign limited partnership that first registers to do business in this state on or after January 1, 2018;

Every foreign limited partnership that registers a name in this state on or after January 1, 2018; and

Every foreign limited partnership that has registered a name in this state prior to January 1, 2018, pursuant to the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988.

With respect to each foreign limited partnership that first registered to do business in this state prior to January 1, 2018, the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988 applies to the foreign limited partnership until the due date of the first annual report required to be filed by the foreign limited partnership on or after January 1, 2018, after which due date this chapter applies to the foreign limited partnership, except that the foreign limited partnership is not required to again register to do business in this state.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced, or right accrued, under the Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.